Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-1704.01
Collection of taxes; notice; receipt; statement; contents.

(1) The county treasurer shall include with each tax notice to every taxpayer and with each receipt provided to a taxpayer the following information:

(a) The total amount of aid from state sources appropriated to the county and each city, village, and school district in the county;

(b) The net amount of property taxes to be levied by the county and each city, village, school district, and learning community in the county;

(c) For real property, the amount of taxes reflected on the statement that are levied by the county, city, village, school district, learning community, and other subdivisions for the tax year and for the immediately past year on the same parcel;

(d) For real property that has its taxes divided under section 18-2147 as part of a redevelopment project under the Community Development Law, the amount of taxes reflected on the statement that are allocated to the county, city, village, school district, learning community, and other subdivisions, the amount of taxes reflected on the statement that are allocated to the redevelopment project, and a statement explaining that taxes on the real property have been divided as part of a redevelopment project under the Community Development Law; and

(e) For taxes levied for fiscal year 2017-18 on real property within a learning community, statements explaining that the school district levies for learning community member districts are increasing, in part, as a result of the expiration of the learning community common levies, the proceeds of which were distributed directly to school districts, and that the remaining learning community levies fund activities of the learning community.

(2) The necessary form for furnishing the information required by subdivisions (1)(a), (b), and (e) of this section shall be prescribed by the Department of Revenue. The necessary information required by subdivision (1)(a) of this section shall be furnished to the county treasurer by the Department of Revenue prior to October 1 of each year. The form prescribed by the Department of Revenue shall contain the following statement:

THE AMOUNT OF STATE FUNDS SHOWN ABOVE WOULD HAVE BEEN ADDITIONAL PROPERTY TAXES IF NOT ALLOCATED TO THE COUNTY, CITY, VILLAGE, AND SCHOOL DISTRICT BY THE LEGISLATURE.

Laws 1972, LB 674, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 163;

Laws 1997, LB 270, § 98;

Laws 1999, LB 881, § 8;

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 9;

Laws 2012, LB851, § 2;

Laws 2016, LB1067, § 8;

Laws 2018, LB874, § 36;

Laws 2020, LB1021, § 16.

Community Development Law, see section 18-2101.